Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2924XC (5) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 462A.10A Boat liveries ââ permits. 1 1. This section shall only apply to boat liveries that 2 provide watercraft for use on lakes operated by the United 3 States army corps of engineers that are located on the Des 4 Moines river and to the waters of those lakes. For purposes 5 of this section, âboat liveryâ includes boat clubs and similar 6 operations. 7 2. a. An owner of a boat livery shall not rent, lease, or 8 otherwise allow the use of any watercraft in waters regulated 9 under this section without sufficient boat permits issued 10 pursuant to this section. 11 b. To obtain a boat permit, an owner of a boat livery shall 12 submit an application to the department that shall include the 13 number of permits the owner is requesting to be issued and any 14 other information the department deems relevant. 15 c. Each boat permit issued to an owner of a boat livery 16 authorizes the owner to allow the use of one watercraft in 17 waters regulated under this section at any given time. 18 3. a. A three-member committee shall be created consisting 19 of a member of the senate chosen by the president of the 20 senate, a member of the house of representatives chosen by the 21 speaker of the house of representatives, and a member of the 22 department appointed by the director. 23 b. The committee created pursuant to this subsection shall, 24 by unanimous consent, determine the number of boat permits to 25 be issued to each applicant and recommend to the commission any 26 rules the committee deems necessary for the safety of rental 27 watercraft users and other watercraft users in the lakes. The 28 permits issued shall be valid for two years. 29 c. The committee shall meet annually before April 1 of each 30 year to review the number of boat permits currently in use, 31 new permit requests, and existing rules. Additional meetings 32 may be called without limitation at the discretion of the 33 committee. 34 d. Any boat permit issued under this subsection may be 35 -1- LSB 2924XC (5) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 S.F. _____ revoked at the discretion of the committee. 1 e. Section 4A.5 does not apply to the committee created 2 pursuant to this subsection. 3 4. The commission shall adopt and the department shall 4 enforce rules pursuant to this section and decisions made by 5 the committee. 6 5. A watercraft registered in a different state but used 7 in waters regulated under this section shall be subject to the 8 requirements of this section. 9 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 10 retroactively to the rental, lease, or other allowance of 11 use by the owner of a boat livery of any watercraft on lakes 12 operated by the United States army corps of engineers that are 13 located on the Des Moines river on and after January 1, 2025. 14